Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1517
Reimbursement for remedial actions and third-party claims; act; how construed.

Reimbursement for remedial actions and third-party claims shall be governed by the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act.

Nothing in the act shall be construed to limit the powers of the department or preclude the pursuit of any other administrative, civil, injunctive, or criminal remedies by the department or any other person. Administrative remedies need not be exhausted in order to proceed under the act. The remedies provided by the act shall be in addition to those provided under existing statutory or common law.

For purposes of section 25-328, the state shall have an interest in any litigation which might result in a third-party claim.

Nothing in the act shall be construed to limit a person's duty to notify the department and the State Fire Marshal or to take other action related to a release as required pursuant to the Environmental Protection Act or the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 10.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.

Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act, see section 81-15,117.